Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
General Provisions

§§ 9-1-1 and 9-1-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-1-1. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 8 (1); 1857, ch. 61, art. 4; 1871, § 878; 1880, § 2263; 1892, § 912; 1906, § 988; Hemingway’s 1917, § 708; 1930, § 731; 1942, § 1646; Laws, 1914, ch. 239]

§9-1-3. [Codes, 1880, §§ 2263, 2292; 1892, §§ 912, 933; 1906, §§ 988, 1009; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 708, 729; 1930, § 732; 1942, § 1647; Laws, 1914, ch. 239]

§ 9-1-5.
Extension into term in other county of same district.

In order to utilize the services of a judge temporarily assigned to chancery or circuit court in a county, the chancery or circuit court judge is authorized to extend a term of his court in one (1) county in a district, even if it overlaps into a term of that court in another county in the same district, so long as the term of court in the county into which the extension runs shall not be pretermitted. The Nineteenth Chancery Court District and the Eighteenth Circuit Court District are hereby excepted from the provisions of this section.

The word “county” wherever used herein shall be construed to mean “judicial district” in counties having two (2) judicial districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1647.5; Laws, 1970, ch. 327, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 9-1-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-1-7. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 10 (4); 1857, ch. 61, art. 3; 1871, § 877; 1880, § 2266; 1892, § 915; 1906, § 991; Hemingway’s 1917, § 711; 1930, § 735; 1942, § 1650]

§ 9-1-9.
Adjourning if the judge be absent.

If the circuit judge or chancellor fail to attend at any term of the court, it shall stand adjourned from day to day until the third day, when, if the judge or chancellor shall not appear and open court, it shall stand adjourned without day; but, by virtue of a written order by the judge or chancellor, it may be adjourned by the clerk or sheriff to any day of the term, as the order may direct, and parties, witnesses and jurors must attend accordingly.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 54, art 2 (6); 1857, ch. 61, art. 6, ch. 62, art. 10; 1871, §§ 881, 984; 1880, § 2264; 1892, § 913; 1906, § 989; Hemingway’s 1917, § 709; 1930, § 733; 1942, § 1648.

§ 9-1-11.
Judge not to sit when interested or related.

The judge of a court shall not preside on the trial of any cause where the parties, or either of them, shall be connected with him by affinity or consanguinity, or where he may be interested in the same, or wherein he may have been of counsel, except by the consent of the judge and of the parties.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 2 (186), ch. 54, art. 2 (7); 1857, ch. 61, art. 12, ch. 62, art. 7; 1871; § 986; 1880, § 2270; 1892, § 919; 1906, § 995; Hemingway’s 1917, § 715; 1930, § 736; 1942, § 1651.

§§ 9-1-13 through 9-1-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 587, § 7, eff from and after April 25, 1989 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§9-1-13. [Codes, 1892, § 921; 1906, § 997; Hemingway’s 1917, § 717; 1930, § 738; 1942, § 1653; Laws, 1928, Ex. ch. 86; Laws, 1952, ch. 235; Laws, 1966, ch. 352, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 429, § 2]

§9-1-14. [En Laws 1983, ch. 518; Laws, 1986, ch. 504]

§9-1-15. [Codes, 1942, § 1653.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 313, § 1]

§ 9-1-17.
Supreme Court, circuit, chancery and county courts and Court of Appeals may punish for contempt and refer certain persons for placement in restitution, house arrest or restorative justice center or program.

The Supreme, circuit, chancery and county courts and the Court of Appeals shall have power to fine and imprison any person guilty of contempt of the court while sitting, but the fine shall not exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each offense, nor shall the imprisonment continue longer than thirty (30) days. If any witness refuse to be sworn or to give evidence, or if any officer or person refuse to obey or perform any rules, order, or judgment of the court, such court shall have power to fine and imprison such officer or person until he shall give evidence, or until the rule, order, or judgment shall be complied with.

At the discretion of the court, any person found in contempt for failure to pay child support and imprisoned therefor may be referred for placement in a state, county or municipal restitution, house arrest or restorative justice center or program, provided such person meets the qualifications prescribed in Section 99-37-19.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 2 (177), ch. 54, art. 2 (48); 1857, ch. 61, art. 37, ch. 62, art. 4; 1871, §§ 538, 980; 1880, § 2273; 1892, § 923; 1906, § 999; Hemingway’s 1917, § 719; 1930, § 741; 1942, § 1656; Laws, 1928, ch. 42; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 10; Laws, 2009, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 9-1-19.
Authority of judges of supreme, circuit courts and chancellors and judges of Court of Appeals to grant remedial writs.

The judges of the Supreme and circuit courts and chancellors and judges of the Court of Appeals, in termtime and in vacation, may severally order the issuance of writs of habeas corpus, mandamus, certiorari, supersedeas and attachments, and grant injunctions and all other remedial writs, in all cases where the same may properly be granted according to right and justice, returnable to any court, whether the suit or proceedings be pending in the district of the judge or chancellor granting the same or not. The fiat of such judge or chancellor shall authorize the issuance of the process for a writ returnable to the proper court or before the proper officer; and all such process or writs may be granted, issued and executed on Sunday.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 6(5); 1857, ch. 61, art. 9, ch. 62, art. 3; 1871, §§ 533, 979; 1880, §§ 1904, 2267; 1892, § 916; 1906, § 992; Hemingway’s 1917, § 712; 1930, § 742; 1942, § 1657; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 11, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-1-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1974, ch. 328, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1974; and by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-1-21. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (175); 1857, ch. 61, art. 14; 1871, § 537; 1880, § 2269; 1892, § 918; 1906, § 994; Hemingway’s 1917, § 714; 1930, § 743; 1942, § 1658]

§ 9-1-23.
Judges conservators of peace; must reside in district.

The judges of the Supreme, circuit and county courts and chancellors and judges of the Court of Appeals shall be conservators of the peace for the state, each with full power to do all acts which conservators of the peace may lawfully do; and the circuit judges and chancellors shall reside within their respective districts and the county judges shall reside in their respective counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 15; 1871, § 532; 1880, § 2268; 1892, § 917; 1906, § 993; Hemingway’s 1917, § 713; 1930, § 740; 1942, § 1655; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 12, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-1-25.
Judges not to practice law.

It shall not be lawful for any judge of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals or a judge of the circuit court, or a chancellor to exercise the profession or employment of an attorney or counsellor at law, or to be engaged in the practice of law; and any person offending against this prohibition shall be guilty of a high misdemeanor and be removed from office; but this shall not prohibit a chancellor or circuit judge or a judge of the Court of Appeals from practicing in any of the courts for a period of six (6) months from the time such judges or chancellors assume office so far as to enable them to bring to a conclusion cases actually pending when they were appointed or elected in which such chancellor or judge was then employed, nor shall a judge of the Supreme Court be hindered from appearing in the courts of the United States in any case in which he was engaged when he was appointed or elected judge.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 26, art. 3 (14); 1857, ch. 9, art. 4; 1871, § 2247; 1880, § 2401; 1892, § 213; 1906, § 219; Hemingway’s 1917, § 193; 1930, § 3696; 1942, § 8668; Laws, 1914, ch. 235; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 13, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-1-27.
Officers pro tempore to be appointed in certain cases.

Whenever a vacancy shall exist in the office of clerk of any court, sheriff, or coroner and the vacancy shall not have been filled on or before the commencement of the term of any court which the clerk, sheriff, or coroner is required to attend, or if the clerk, sheriff, or coroner shall be absent, deceased, become unable, or refuse to discharge his duties, or be on trial therein, the court, or the judge or judges thereof, shall have power to appoint a suitable person to discharge the duties of clerk, sheriff, or coroner pro tempore, who shall take the oath required by law, and perform the duties and receive the emoluments of the office to which he is appointed, until the proper incumbent shall be duly qualified or return to his duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 27, class 2, art. 4, class 3, art. 1 (11); 1857, ch. 62, art. 14; 1871, § 983; 1880, § 2279; 1892, § 928; 1906, § 1004; Hemingway’s 1917, § 724; 1930, § 748; 1942, § 1663.

§ 9-1-29.
Court to control clerk’s office.

Each court shall have control over all proceedings in the clerk’s office, and such control shall be exercised in a manner consistent with the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 54, art. 2 (22); 1857, ch. 61, art. 26, ch. 62, art. 9; 1871, §§ 542, 982; 1880, § 2274; 1892, § 924; 1906, § 1000; Hemingway’s 1917, § 720; 1930, § 749; 1942, § 1664; Laws, 1978, ch. 425, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 9-1-31.
Records of office of clerk delivered to successor.

When the office of clerk of any court shall become vacant, the records, papers, books, stationery, and everything belonging thereto, shall be delivered to the successor in office by any person having the same, on demand; and if any person having such records, papers, books, stationery, or other things shall refuse to deliver the same on demand to the person entitled thereto, he shall be liable for all damages sustained by any person aggrieved thereby; and in case of a refusal or a detention of the same, or of any part thereof, after demand made, the court may compel the delivery thereof, by fine and imprisonment at discretion, for contempt of court; and the court, or judge in vacation, may order process to be issued for the seizure of such records, papers, books, stationery, and other things, and for the delivery thereof to the successor in office.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 27, class 2, art. 1 (14), class 3, art. 1 (12); 1857, ch. 61, art. 18, ch. 62, art. 18; 1871, §§ 555, 994; 1880, § 2280; 1892, § 929; 1906, § 1005; Hemingway’s 1917, § 725; 1930, § 754; 1942, § 1669.

§ 9-1-33.
Minutes of Supreme Court, circuit, chancery and county courts and Court of Appeals.

The minutes of the proceedings of the Supreme, circuit, chancery and county courts and the Court of Appeals shall be entered by the clerk of each, respectively, in the minute book of the court, against the next sitting of the court, if practicable, when the same shall be read in open court; and when corrected shall be signed – the minutes of the Supreme Court by the Chief Justice or presiding judge, of the Court of Appeals by the Chief Judge or presiding judge, of the circuit court by the circuit judge, of the chancery court by the chancellor, and of the county court by the county judge; and on the last day of the term, or within ten (10) days thereafter, the minutes shall be drawn up, read and signed.

Whenever by inadvertence said minutes and proceedings may remain unsigned or the judge of said court dies before signing the minutes, the succeeding judge or judges of said court may, in their discretion, examine into said unsigned minutes and ascertain as to the correctness thereof, and after same shall have been read in open court, and if the court is of the opinion that same are true and correct, then the said minutes may be signed and adopted by said judge or judges.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1847, ch. 53, art. 2 (159), ch. 54, art. 2 (54); 1857, ch. 61, art. 23, ch. 62, art. 15; 1871, §§ 543, 991; 1880, § 2282; 1892, § 931; 1906, § 1007; Hemingway’s 1917, § 727; 1930, § 750; 1942, § 1665; Laws, 1962, ch. 307; Laws, 1980, ch. 393; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 14, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-1-35.
Seal of court.

The clerk of the Supreme Court and of the Court of Appeals, at the expense of the state, and the clerk of every circuit and chancery court, at the expense of the county, shall keep a seal, with the style of the court around the margin and the image of an eagle in the center.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 2 (188), ch. 54, art. 2 (64); 1857, ch. 61, art. 19, ch. 62, art. 19; 1871, §§ 556, 1273; 1880, §§ 1410, 2275; 1892, § 925; 1906, § 1001; Hemingway’s 1917, § 721; 1930, § 752; 1942, § 1667; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 15, eff from and after date said ch. 518, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-1-36.
Office allowance for circuit judges, chancellors and certain staff; procedure to employ certain staff members; title to tangible property; reports; adoption of rules and regulations.

Each circuit judge and chancellor shall receive an office operating allowance for the expenses of operating the office of the judge, including retaining a law clerk, legal research, stenographic help, stationery, stamps, furniture, office equipment, telephone, office rent and other items and expenditures necessary and incident to maintaining the office of judge. The allowance shall be paid only to the extent of actual expenses incurred by the judge as itemized and certified by the judge to the Supreme Court in the amounts set forth in this subsection; however, the judge may expend sums in excess thereof from the compensation otherwise provided for his office. No part of this expense or allowance shall be used to pay an official court reporter for services rendered to said court.

Until July 1, 2008, the office operating allowance under this subsection shall be not less than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) nor more than Nine Thousand Dollars ($9,000.00) per annum.

From and after July 1, 2008, the office operating allowance under this subsection shall be Nine Thousand Dollars ($9,000.00) per annum.

In addition to the amounts provided for in subsection (1), there is hereby created a separate office allowance fund for the purpose of providing support staff to judges. This fund shall be managed by the Administrative Office of Courts.

Each judge who desires to employ support staff after July 1, 1994, shall make application to the Administrative Office of Courts by submitting to the Administrative Office of Courts a proposed personnel plan setting forth what support staff is deemed necessary. The plan may be submitted by a single judge or by any combination of judges desiring to share support staff. In the process of the preparation of the plan, the judges, at their request, may receive advice, suggestions, recommendations and other assistance from the Administrative Office of Courts. The Administrative Office of Courts must approve the positions, job descriptions and salaries before the positions may be filled. The Administrative Office of Courts shall not approve any plan which does not first require the expenditure of the funds in the support staff fund for compensation of any of the support staff before expenditure is authorized of county funds for that purpose. Upon approval by the Administrative Office of Courts, the judge or judges may appoint the employees to the position or positions, and each employee so appointed will work at the will and pleasure of the judge or judges who appointed him but will be employees of the Administrative Office of Courts. Upon approval by the Administrative Office of Courts, the appointment of any support staff shall be evidenced by the entry of an order on the minutes of the court. When support staff is appointed jointly by two (2) or more judges, the order setting forth any appointment shall be entered on the minutes of each participating court.

The Administrative Office of Courts shall develop and promulgate minimum qualifications for the certification of court administrators. Any court administrator appointed on or after October 1, 1996, shall be required to be certified by the Administrative Office of Courts.

Support staff shall receive compensation pursuant to personnel policies established by the Administrative Office of Courts; however:

From and after July 1, 1994, the Administrative Office of Courts shall allocate from the support staff fund an amount of Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) per fiscal year per judge for whom support staff is approved for the funding of support staff assigned to a judge or judges; and

From and after July 1, 2008, the Administrative Office of Courts shall allocate from the support staff fund an amount of Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00), in addition to the amount provided in paragraph (a). Of the amount provided in this paragraph (b), each judge shall utilize an amount sufficient to ensure that judge has access to the services of a law clerk, whether hired by the judge separately or in concert with another judge. Any excess funds remaining upon satisfaction of this requirement may be used for any other support staff as defined in this section. Any employment pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of Section 25-1-53.

The Administrative Office of Courts may approve expenditure from the fund for additional equipment for support staff appointed pursuant to this section in any year in which the allocation per judge is sufficient to meet the equipment expense after provision for the compensation of the support staff.

For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Judges” means circuit judges and chancellors, or any combination thereof;

“Support staff” means court administrators, law clerks, legal research assistants or secretaries, or any combination thereof, but shall not mean school attendance officers;

“Compensation” means the gross salary plus all amounts paid for benefits or otherwise as a result of employment or as required by employment; provided, however, that only salary earned for services rendered shall be reported and credited for Public Employees’ Retirement System purposes. Amounts paid for benefits or otherwise, including reimbursement for travel expenses, shall not be reported or credited for retirement purposes;

“Law clerk” means a clerk hired to assist a judge or judges who has a law degree or who is a full-time law student who is making satisfactory progress at an accredited law school.

Title to all tangible property, excepting stamps, stationery and minor expendable office supplies, procured with funds authorized by this section, shall be and forever remain in the State of Mississippi to be used by the circuit judge or chancellor during the term of his office and thereafter by his successors.

Any circuit judge or chancellor who did not have a primary office provided by the county on March 1, 1988, shall be allowed an additional Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) per annum to defray the actual expenses incurred by the judge or chancellor in maintaining an office; however, any circuit judge or chancellor who had a primary office provided by the county on March 1, 1988, and who vacated the office space after that date for a legitimate reason, as determined by the Department of Finance and Administration, shall be allowed the additional office expense allowance provided under this subsection. The county in which a circuit judge or chancellor sits is authorized to provide funds from any available source to assist in defraying the actual expenses to maintain an office.

The Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of Courts, shall submit to the Department of Finance and Administration the itemized and certified expenses for office operating allowances that are directed to the court pursuant to this section.

The Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of Courts, shall have the power to adopt rules and regulations regarding the administration of the office operating allowance authorized pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4175.6; Laws, 1972, ch. 398, §§ 1, 2, 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 528, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 42; Laws, 1994, ch. 506, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 414, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 524, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 557, § 3; brought forward without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 561, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 9-1-37.
Allowance for stationery.

The circuit, chancery and county courts shall make allowance to the clerks thereof of all needful sums for supplying the offices and courtrooms with necessary stationery, furniture, books, presses, seals, and other things necessary for the same, and for the safe-keeping of the books, records, and papers belonging thereto; and such allowance shall be certified to the board of supervisors. Provided, however, that in no event shall said circuit, chancery or county courts be allowed to purchase furniture in excess of five hundred dollars for any one year without first securing the approval of the board of supervisors of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 27, class 2, art. 1 (157), class 3, art. 1 (52); 1857, ch. 61, art. 27, ch. 62, art. 19; 1871, §§ 541, 985; 1880, § 2276; 1892, § 926; 1906, § 1002; Hemingway’s 1917, § 722; 1930, § 753; 1942, § 1668; Laws, 1936, ch. 252.

§ 9-1-38.
Certain judicial records exempt from public access requirements.

Records in the possession of a public body, as defined by paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3, which are developed among judges and among judges and their aides, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 424, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 9-1-39.
Clerks of circuit, chancery and county courts in separate judicial districts in Harrison County.

In Harrison County, a county having two judicial districts, the clerks of the circuit and chancery courts of said county shall be the clerks of the respective circuit and chancery courts in each of the districts aforesaid and the circuit clerk shall additionally be the clerk of the county court as provided by law, in each of said districts and they shall keep offices both at Gulfport and Biloxi, in which all books, records, dockets, papers and documents belonging to each of the courts of said district shall be kept respectively; and all dockets, records, papers and books required to be kept by law by clerks of the circuit, chancery and county courts in this state shall be kept by each of said clerks respectively at Gulfport and Biloxi, for each of said districts; and the enrollment of a judgment or decree in the district where the same may be rendered or obtained, shall be a lien on all property of the person against whom the same may be rendered within the district where so enrolled.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2910-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 257, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 9-1-41.
Reasonableness of attorneys’ fees; evidence.

In any action in which a court is authorized to award reasonable attorneys’ fees, the court shall not require the party seeking such fees to put on proof as to the reasonableness of the amount sought, but shall make the award based on the information already before it and the court’s own opinion based on experience and observation; provided however, a party may, in its discretion, place before the court other evidence as to the reasonableness of the amount of the award, and the court may consider such evidence in making the award.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 13, 1990).

§ 9-1-43.
Limit on compensation of chancery clerks and circuit clerks and their related employees; liability on bonds; chancery court clerk clearing accounts; circuit court clerk clearing accounts; journals and receipts; punishment for failure to deposit funds.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

After making deductions for employer contributions paid by the chancery or circuit clerk to the Public Employees’ Retirement System under Sections 25-11-106.1 and 25-11-123(f)(4), employee salaries and related salary expenses, and expenses allowed as deductions by Schedule C of the Internal Revenue Code, no office of the chancery clerk or circuit clerk of any county in the state shall receive fees as compensation for the chancery clerk’s or circuit clerk’s services in excess of Ninety-four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($94,500.00). All such fees received by the office of chancery or circuit clerks that are in excess of the salary limitation shall be deposited by such clerk into the county general fund on or before April 15 for the preceding calendar year. If the chancery clerk or circuit clerk serves less than one (1) year, then he shall not receive as compensation any fees in excess of that portion of the salary limitation that can be attributed to his time in office on a pro rata basis. Upon leaving office, income earned by any clerk in his last full year of office but not received until after his last full year of office shall not be included in determining the salary limitation of the successor clerk. There shall be exempted from the provisions of this subsection any monies or commissions from private or governmental sources which: (a) are to be held by the chancery or circuit clerk in a trust or custodial capacity as prescribed in subsections (4) and (5); or (b) are received as compensation for services performed upon order of a court or board of supervisors which are not required of the chancery clerk or circuit clerk by statute.

It shall be unlawful for any chancery clerk or circuit clerk to use fees in excess of Ninety-four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($94,500.00), to pay the salaries or actual or necessary expenses of employees who are related to such clerk by blood or marriage within the first degree of kinship according to the civil law method of computing kinship as provided in Sections 1-3-71 and 1-3-73. However, the prohibition of this subsection shall not apply to any individual who was an employee of the clerk’s office prior to the date his or her relative was elected as chancery or circuit clerk. The spouse and/or any children of the chancery clerk or circuit clerk employed in the office of the chancery clerk may be paid a salary; however, the combined annual salaries of the clerk, spouse and any child of the clerk may not exceed an amount equal to the salary limitation.

The chancery clerk and the circuit clerk shall be liable on their official bond for the proper deposit and accounting of all monies received by his office. The State Auditor shall promulgate uniform accounting methods for the accounting of all sources of income by the offices of the chancery and circuit clerk.

There is created in the county depository of each county a clearing account to be designated as the “chancery court clerk clearing account,” into which shall be deposited: (a) all such monies as the clerk of the chancery court shall receive from any person complying with any writ of garnishment, attachment, execution or other like process authorized by law for the enforcement of child support, spousal support or any other judgment; (b) any portion of any fees required by law to be collected in civil cases which are to pay for the service of process or writs in another county; and (c) any other money as shall be deposited with the court which by its nature is not, at the time of its deposit, public monies, but which is to be held by the court in a trust or custodial capacity in a case or proceeding before the court. The clerk of the chancery court shall account for all monies deposited in and disbursed from such account and shall be authorized and empowered to draw and issue checks on such account at such times, in such amounts and to such persons as shall be proper and in accordance with law.

The following monies paid to the chancery clerk shall be subject to the salary limitation prescribed under subsection (1): (a) all fees required by law to be collected for the filing, recording or abstracting of any bill, petition, pleading or decree in any civil case in chancery; (b) all fees collected for land recordings, charters, notary bonds, certification of decrees and copies of any documents; (c) all land redemption and mineral documentary stamp commissions; and (d) any other monies or commissions from private or governmental sources for statutory functions which are not to be held by the court in a trust capacity. Such fees as shall exceed the salary limitations shall be maintained in a bank account in the county depository and accounted for separately from those monies paid into the chancery court clerk clearing account.

There is created in the county depository in each county a clearing account to be designated as the “circuit court clerk civil clearing account,” into which shall be deposited: (a) all such monies and fees as the clerk of the circuit court shall receive from any person complying with any writ of garnishment, attachment, execution or any other like process authorized by law for the enforcement of a judgment; (b) any portion of any fees required by law or court order to be collected in civil cases; (c) all fees collected for the issuance of marriage licenses; and (d) any other money as shall be deposited with the court which by its nature is not, at the time of its deposit, public monies but which is to be held by the court in a trust or custodial capacity in a case or proceeding before the court.

There is created in the county depository in each county a clearing account to be designated as the “circuit court clerk criminal clearing account,” into which shall be deposited: (a) all such monies as are received in criminal cases in the circuit court pursuant to any order requiring payment as restitution to the victims of criminal offenses; (b) any portion of any fees and fines required by law or court order to be collected in criminal cases; and (c) all cash bonds as shall be deposited with the court. The clerk of the circuit court shall account for all monies deposited in and disbursed from such account and shall be authorized and empowered to draw and issue checks on such account, at such times, in such amounts and to such persons as shall be proper and in accordance with law; however, such monies as are forfeited in criminal cases shall be paid by the clerk of the circuit court to the clerk of the board of supervisors for deposit in the general fund of the county.

The following monies paid to the circuit clerk shall be subject to the salary limitation prescribed under subsection (1): (a) all fees required by law to be collected for the filing, recording or abstracting of any bill, petition, pleading or decree in any civil action in circuit court; (b) copies of any documents; and (c) any other monies or commissions from private or governmental sources for statutory functions which are not to be held by the court in a trust capacity.

The chancery clerk and the circuit clerk shall establish and maintain a cash journal for recording cash receipts from private or government sources for furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file, or for rendering services as a notary public, or other fees wherein the total fee for the transaction is Ten Dollars ($10.00) or less. The cash journal entry shall include the date, amount and type of transaction, and the clerk shall not be required to issue a receipt to the person receiving such services. The State Auditor shall not take exception to the furnishing of copies or the rendering of services as a notary by any clerk free of charge.

In any county having two (2) judicial districts, whenever the chancery clerk serves as deputy to the circuit clerk in one (1) judicial district and the circuit clerk serves as deputy to the chancery clerk in the other judicial district, the chancery clerk may maintain a cash journal, separate from the cash journal maintained for chancery clerk receipts, for recording the cash receipts paid to him as deputy circuit clerk, and the circuit clerk may maintain a cash journal, separate from the cash journal maintained for circuit clerk receipts, for recording the cash receipts paid to him as deputy chancery clerk. The cash receipts collected by the chancery clerk in his capacity as deputy circuit clerk and the cash receipts collected by the circuit clerk in his capacity as deputy chancery clerk shall be subject to the salary limitation prescribed under subsection (1).

Any clerk who knowingly shall fail to deposit funds or otherwise violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor in office and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined in an amount not to exceed double the amount that he failed to deposit, or imprisoned for not to exceed six (6) months in the county jail, or be punished by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 9; Laws, 1998, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 11; Laws, 2011, ch. 402, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2011); Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 9-1-44.
Appropriation of funds from county general fund to supplement payment of expenses of office of chancery or circuit clerk under certain circumstances.

If the total amount of all fees received by the office of the chancery clerk or by the office of the circuit clerk in any year are insufficient to pay the expenses of the office for that year, the clerk shall notify the board of supervisors, and if the board of supervisors makes a finding and enters on its minutes the finding that the fees received by the office of the clerk are insufficient to pay the expenses of the office for that year, then the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may appropriate funds from the general fund of the county to the office of the clerk as necessary to supplement the payment of the expenses of the office of the clerk.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 2019).

§ 9-1-45.
Filing of annual reports by chancery and circuit clerks; failure to provide report; notice of noncompliance; hearing to determine level of compliance; penalties for noncompliance.

Each chancery and circuit clerk shall file, not later than April 15 of each year, with the State Auditor of Public Accounts a true and accurate annual report on a form to be designed and supplied to each clerk by the State Auditor of Public Accounts immediately after January 1 of each year. The form shall include the following information: (a) revenues subject to the salary cap, including fees; (b) revenues not subject to the salary cap; and (c) expenses of office, including any salary paid to a clerk’s spouse or children. Each chancery and circuit clerk shall provide any additional information requested by the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the purpose of retirement calculations.

In any county having two (2) judicial districts, a separate report may be filed by the chancery clerk and circuit clerk for each judicial district. Whenever the chancery clerk serves as deputy to the circuit clerk in one (1) judicial district and the circuit clerk serves as deputy to the chancery clerk in the other judicial district, each clerk may file, for the judicial district in which he serves, one (1) report for the revenues and expenses of his office in his capacity as chancery or circuit clerk and a separate report for reporting the revenues collected and expenses incurred in his capacity as deputy circuit or deputy chancery clerk.

If the chancery or circuit clerk fails to provide the reports required in this section, then the State Auditor shall give by United States certified mail, return receipt requested, written notification to the chancery or circuit clerk of noncompliance. If within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice, the chancery or circuit clerk, in the opinion of the State Auditor, remains in noncompliance, the State Auditor may institute civil proceedings in a court of the county in which the clerk serves. The court, upon a hearing, shall decide the issue and if it determines that the clerk is not in substantial compliance, shall order the clerk to immediately and thereafter comply. Violations of any order of the court shall be punishable as for contempt. In addition, the court in its discretion may impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) upon the clerk, for which he shall be liable in his individual capacity, for any such noncompliance that the court determines as intentional or willful.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 535, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 369, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 12, 2004).